California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(5) The amount of any surplus or deficit revenues to be carried over from a previous fiscal year.

(6) The amount of any contributions to be made from sources other than assessments levied pursuant to this part.

(c) The city council may approve the report as filed by the advisory board or may modify any particular contained in the report and approve it as modified. The city council shall not approve a change in the basis and method of levying assessments that would impair an authorized or executed contract to be paid from the revenues derived from the levy of assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36534.

(a) After the approval of the report, the city council shall adopt a resolution of intention to levy an annual assessment for that fiscal year. The resolution of intention shall do all of the following:

(1) Declare the intention of the city council to change the boundaries of the parking and business improvement area, or in any benefit zone within the area, if the report filed pursuant to Section 36533 proposes a change.

(2) Declare the intention of the city council to levy and collect assessments within the parking and business improvement area for the fiscal year stated in the resolution.

(3) Generally describe the proposed improvements and activities authorized by the ordinance enacted pursuant to Section 36527 and any substantial changes proposed to be made to the improvements and activities.

(4) Refer to the parking and business improvement area by name and indicate the location of the area.

(5) Refer to the report on file with the clerk for a full and detailed description of the improvements and activities to be provided for that fiscal year, the boundaries of the area and any benefit zones within the area, and the proposed assessments to be levied upon the businesses within the area for that fiscal year.

(6) Fix a time and place for a public hearing to be held by the city council on the levy of the proposed assessment for that fiscal year. The public hearing shall be held not less than 10 days after the adoption of the resolution of intention.

(7) State that at the public hearing written and oral protests may be made. The form and manner of protests shall comply with Sections 36524 and 36525.

(b) The clerk shall give notice of the public hearing by causing the resolution of intention to be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the city not less than seven days before the public hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36535.

(a) The city council shall hold the public hearing at the time and in the place specified in the resolution of intention. The public hearing shall be conducted as provided in Sections 36524 and 36525. The city council may continue the public hearing from time to time.

(b) During the course or upon the conclusion of the public hearing, the city council may order changes in any of the matters provided in the report, including changes in the proposed assessments, the proposed improvements and activities to be funded with the revenues derived from the levy of the assessments, and the proposed boundaries of the area and any benefit zones within the area. The city council shall not change the boundaries to include any territory that will not, in its judgment, benefit by the improvement or activity.

(c) At the conclusion of the public hearing, the city council may adopt a resolution confirming the report as originally filed or as changed by it. The adoption of the resolution shall constitute the levy of an assessment for the fiscal year referred to in the report.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), if the primary purpose of the area is promotion of tourism, the city council may adopt a resolution confirming the report as submitted by the advisory board, or may adopt a resolution continuing the program and assessments as levied in the then current year without change, and that resolution shall constitute the levy of an assessment for the fiscal year referred to in the report. As an alternative, the city council may modify the report and adopt a resolution confirming the report as modified, but in that case the city council may adopt the resolution only after providing notice of the proposed changes as specified in Section 36523 and only after conducting a public hearing on the resolution as provided in Sections 36524 and 36525.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 114, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

36536.

The assessments levied on businesses pursuant to this part shall be levied on the basis of the estimated benefit to the businesses and property within the parking and business improvement area. The city council may classify businesses for purposes of determining the benefit to a business of the improvements and activities provided pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36537.

The validity of an assessment levied under this part shall not be contested in any action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding is commenced within 30 days after the resolution levying the assessment is adopted pursuant to Section 36535. Any appeal from a final judgment in an action or proceeding shall be perfected within 30 days after the entry of judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36538.

(a) An assessment pursuant to this part is a fee imposed by a government on the transaction for purposes of paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 1770 of the Civil Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 400, Sec. 8.   (SB 478)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Modification of Boundaries, Assessments, Improvements, or Activities [36540. - 36542.]

36540.

In addition to the changes authorized to be made in the annual report filed with the city council pursuant to Section 36533 or at the conclusion of the public hearing on the annual levy of the assessments, the advisory board may, at any time, recommend that the city council modify the boundaries of the area, any benefit zones within the area, the basis and method of levying the assessments, and any improvements or activities to be funded with the revenues derived from the levy of the assessments. Any modification shall be made pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36541.

(a) The city council shall modify the basis and method of levying the assessment or the boundaries of the area by adopting an ordinance after holding a public hearing on the proposed modification.

(b) The city council shall adopt a resolution of intention which states the proposed modification prior to the public hearing required by this section. The public hearing shall be consistent with the requirements of Section 54954.6 of the Government Code. Notice of the public hearing shall be published and shall be mailed to each owner of a business affected by the proposed modification, as provided in Section 36523. The public hearing shall be conducted as provided in Sections 36524 and 36525.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 114, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

36542.

(a) The city council may modify the improvements and activities to be funded with the revenue derived from the levy of the assessments by adopting a resolution determining to make the modifications after holding a public hearing on the proposed modifications. Notice of the public hearing and the proposed modifications shall be published as provided in Section 36523.

(b) The public hearing shall be conducted as provided in Sections 36524 and 36525.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Disestablishment [36550. - 36551.]

36550.

(a) The city council may disestablish an area by adopting an ordinance after holding a public hearing on the disestablishment, as provided in this section.

(b) The city council shall adopt a resolution of intention to disestablish the area prior to the public hearing required by this section. The resolution shall state the reason for the disestablishment, shall state the time and place of the public hearing, and shall contain a proposal to dispose of any assets acquired with the revenues of the assessments levied within the parking and business improvement area. The public hearing shall be held not less than 20 or more than 30 days after the adoption of the resolution of intention. Notice of the public hearing shall be published as provided in Section 36523.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36551.

(a) Upon the disestablishment of an area, any remaining revenues derived from the levy of assessments, or any revenues derived from the sale of assets acquired with the revenues, shall be refunded to the owners of the businesses then located and operating within the area in which assessments were levied by applying the same method and basis that was used to calculate the assessments levied in the fiscal year in which the area is disestablished.

(b) If the disestablishment occurs before an assessment is levied for the fiscal year, the method and basis that was used to calculate the assessments levied in the immediate prior fiscal year shall be used to calculate the amount of any refund. Notice of the disestablishment of an area shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the city, not later than 15 days after the ordinance disestablishing the area is adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 591, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. PROPERTY AND BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT LAW OF 1994 [36600. - 36671.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [36600. - 36617.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declarations [36600. - 36604.]

36600.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Property and Business Improvement District Law of 1994.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 897, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

36601.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Businesses located and operating within business districts in some of this state’s communities are economically disadvantaged, are underutilized, and are unable to attract customers due to inadequate facilities, services, and activities in the business districts.

(b) It is in the public interest to promote the economic revitalization and physical maintenance of business districts in order to create jobs, attract new businesses, and prevent the erosion of the business districts.

(c) It is of particular local benefit to allow business districts to fund
 business related improvements, maintenance, and activities through the levy of assessments upon the businesses or real property that receive benefits from those improvements.

(d) Assessments levied for the purpose of conferring special benefit upon the real property or a specific benefit upon the businesses in a business district are not taxes for the general benefit of a city, even if property, businesses, or persons not assessed receive incidental or collateral effects that benefit them.

(e) Property and business improvement districts formed throughout this state have conferred special benefits upon properties and businesses within their districts and have made those properties and businesses more useful by providing the following benefits:

(1) Crime reduction. A study by the Rand Corporation has confirmed a
 12-percent reduction in the incidence of robbery and an 8-percent reduction in the total incidence of violent crimes within the 30 districts studied.

(2) Job creation.

(3) Business attraction.

(4) Business retention.

(5) Economic growth.

(6) New investments.

(f) With the dissolution of redevelopment agencies throughout the state, property and business improvement districts have become even more important tools with which communities can combat blight, promote economic opportunities, and create a clean and safe environment.

(g) Since the enactment of this act,
 the people of California have adopted Proposition 218, which added Article XIIID to the Constitution in order to place certain requirements and restrictions on the formation of, and activities, expenditures, and assessments by property-based districts. Article XIIID of the Constitution provides that property-based districts may only levy assessments for special benefits.

(h) The act amending this section is intended to provide the Legislature’s guidance with regard to this act, its interaction with the provisions of Article XIIID of the Constitution, and the determination of special benefits in property-based districts.

(1) The lack of legislative guidance has resulted in uncertainty and inconsistent application of this act, which discourages the use of assessments to fund needed improvements, maintenance,
 and activities in property-based districts, contributing to blight and other underutilization of property.

(2) Activities undertaken for the purpose of conferring special benefits upon property to be assessed inherently produce incidental or collateral effects that benefit property or persons not assessed. Therefore, for special benefits to exist as a separate and distinct category from general benefits, the incidental or collateral effects of those special benefits are inherently part of those special benefits. The mere fact that special benefits produce incidental or collateral effects that benefit property or persons not assessed does not convert any portion of those special benefits or their incidental or collateral effects into general benefits.

(3) It is of the utmost importance that property-based districts created under this act have clarity regarding restrictions on
 assessments they may levy and the proper determination of special benefits. Legislative clarity with regard to this act will provide districts with clear instructions and courts with legislative intent regarding restrictions on property-based assessments, and the manner in which special benefits should be determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 366, Sec. 27.   (SB 974)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

36602.

The purpose of this part is to supplement previously enacted provisions of law that authorize cities to levy assessments within property and business improvement districts, to ensure that those assessments conform to all constitutional requirements and are determined and assessed in accordance with the guidance set forth in this act. This part does not affect or limit any other provisions of law authorizing or providing for the furnishing of improvements or activities or the raising of revenue for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 2.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36603.

Nothing in this part is intended to preempt the authority of a charter city to adopt ordinances providing for a different method of levying assessments for similar or additional purposes from those set forth in this part. A property and business improvement district created pursuant to this part is expressly exempt from the provisions of the Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931 (Division 4 (commencing with Section 2800)).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 897, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

36603.5.

Any provision of this part that conflicts with any other provision of law shall prevail over the other provision of law, as to districts created under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 3.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36604.

This part is intended to be construed liberally and, if any provision is held invalid, the remaining provisions shall remain in full force and effect. Assessments levied under this part are not special taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 897, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [36606. - 36616.]

36606.

“Activities” means, but is not limited to, all of the following that benefit businesses or real property in the district:

(a) Promotion of public events.

(b) Furnishing of music in any public place.

(c) Promotion of tourism within the district.

(d) Marketing and economic development, including retail retention and recruitment.

(e) Providing security, sanitation, graffiti removal, street and sidewalk cleaning, and other municipal services supplemental to those normally provided by the
 municipality.

(f) Other services provided for the purpose of conferring special benefit upon assessed real property or specific benefits upon assessed businesses located in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 366, Sec. 28.   (SB 974)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

36606.5.

“Assessment” means a levy for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, installing, or maintaining improvements and providing activities that will provide certain benefits to properties or businesses located within a property and business improvement district.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 36606 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 4.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36607.

“Business” means all types of businesses and includes financial institutions and professions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 897, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

36608.

“City” means a city, county, city and county, or an agency or entity created pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the public member agencies of which includes only cities, counties, or a city and county, or the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 382, Sec. 15.   (SB 194)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

36609.

“City council” means the city council of a city or the board of supervisors of a county, or the agency, commission, or board created pursuant to a joint powers agreement and which is a city within the meaning of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 897, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

36609.4.

“Clerk” means the clerk of the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 5.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36609.5.

“General benefit” means, for purposes of a property-based district, any benefit that is not a “special benefit” as defined in Section 36615.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 6.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36610.

“Improvement” means the acquisition, construction, installation, or maintenance of any tangible property with an estimated useful life of five years or more including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Parking facilities.

(b) Benches, booths, kiosks, display cases, pedestrian shelters and signs.

(c) Trash receptacles and public restrooms.

(d) Lighting and heating facilities.

(e) Decorations.

(f) Parks.

(g) Fountains.

(h) Planting areas.

(i) Closing, opening, widening, or narrowing of existing streets.

(j) Facilities or equipment, or both, to enhance security of persons and property within the district.

(k) Ramps, sidewalks, plazas, and pedestrian malls.

(l) Rehabilitation or removal of existing structures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 366, Sec. 29.   (SB 974)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

36611.

“Management district plan” or “plan” means a proposal as defined in Section 36622.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 36614 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 10.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36612.

“Owners’ association” means a private nonprofit entity that is under contract with a city to administer or implement improvements, maintenance, and activities specified in the management district plan. An owners’ association may be an existing nonprofit entity or a newly formed nonprofit entity. An owners’ association is a private entity and may not be considered a public entity for any purpose, nor may its board members or staff be considered to be public officials for any purpose. Notwithstanding this section, an owners’ association shall comply with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), at all times when matters within the subject matter of the district are heard,
 discussed, or deliberated, and with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), for all records relating to activities of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 420.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

36614.

“Property” means real property situated within a district.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 36612 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 8.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36614.5.

“Property and business improvement district,” or “district,” means a property and business improvement district established pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 36611 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 7.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36614.6.

“Property-based assessment” means any assessment made pursuant to this part upon real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 12.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36614.7.

“Property-based district” means any district in which a city levies a property-based assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 13.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36615.

“Property owner” means any person shown as the owner of land on the last equalized assessment roll or otherwise known to be the owner of land by the city council. “Business owner” means any person recognized by the city as the owner of the business. “Owner” means either a business owner or a property owner. The city council has no obligation to obtain other information as to the ownership of land or businesses, and its determination of ownership shall be final and conclusive for the purposes of this part. Wherever this part requires the signature of the property owner, the signature of the authorized agent of the property owner shall be sufficient. Wherever this part requires the signature of the business owner, the signature of the authorized agent of the business
 owner shall be sufficient.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 382, Sec. 16.   (SB 194)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

36615.5.

(a) “Special benefit” means, for purposes of a property-based district, a particular and distinct benefit over and above general benefits conferred on real property located in a district or to the public at large. Special benefit includes incidental or collateral effects that arise from the improvements, maintenance, or activities of property-based districts even if those incidental or collateral effects benefit property or persons not assessed. Special benefit excludes general enhancement of property value.

(b) “Special benefit” also includes, for purposes of a property-based district, a particular and distinct benefit provided directly to
 each assessed parcel within the district. Merely because parcels throughout an assessment district share the same special benefits does not make the benefits general.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   (AB 2890)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

36616.

“Tenant” means an occupant pursuant to a lease of commercial space or a dwelling unit, other than an owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 897, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Prior Law [36617. - 36617.]

36617.

This part provides an alternative method of financing certain improvements and activities. The provisions of this part shall not affect or limit any other provisions of law authorizing or providing for the furnishing of improvements or activities or the raising of revenue for these purposes. Every improvement area established pursuant to the Parking and Business Improvement Area Law of 1989 (Part 6 (commencing with Section 36500) of this division) is valid and effective and is unaffected by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 897, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Establishment [36620. - 36630.]

36620.

A property and business improvement district may be established as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 897, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

36620.5.

A county may not form a district within the territorial jurisdiction of a city without the consent of the city council of that city. A city may not form a district within the unincorporated territory of a county without the consent of the board of supervisors of that county. A city may not form a district within the territorial jurisdiction of another city without the consent of the city council of the other city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 897, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

36621.

(a) Upon the submission of a written petition, signed by the property or business owners in the proposed district who will pay more than 50 percent of the assessments proposed to be levied, the city council may initiate proceedings to form a district by the adoption of a resolution expressing its intention to form a district. The amount of assessment attributable to property or a business owned by the same property or business owner that is in excess of 40 percent of the amount of all assessments proposed to be levied, shall not be included in determining whether the petition is signed by property or business owners who will pay more than 50 percent of the total amount of assessments proposed to be levied.

(b) The petition of property or business owners required under subdivision (a) shall include a summary of the management district plan. That summary shall include all of the following:

(1) A map showing the boundaries of the district.

(2) Information specifying where the complete management district plan can be obtained.

(3) Information specifying that the complete management district plan shall be furnished upon request.

(c) The resolution of intention described in subdivision (a) shall contain all of the following:

(1) A brief description
 of the proposed improvements, maintenance, and activities, the amount of the proposed assessment, a statement as to whether the assessment will be levied on property or businesses within the district, a statement as to whether bonds will be issued, and a description of the exterior boundaries of the proposed district, which may be made by reference to any plan or map that is on file with the clerk. The descriptions and statements do not need to be detailed and shall be sufficient if they enable an owner to generally identify the nature and extent of the improvements, maintenance, and activities, and the location and extent of the proposed district.

(2) A time and place for a public hearing on the establishment of the property and business improvement district and
 the levy of assessments, which shall be consistent with the requirements of Section 36623.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 15.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36622.

The management district plan shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) If the assessment will be levied on property, a map of the district in sufficient detail to locate each parcel of property and, if businesses are to be assessed, each business within the district. If the assessment will be levied on businesses, a map that identifies the district boundaries in sufficient detail to allow a business owner to reasonably determine whether a business is located within the district boundaries. If the assessment will be levied on property and businesses, a map of the district in sufficient detail to locate each parcel of property and to allow a business owner to reasonably determine
 whether a business is located within the district boundaries.

(b) The name of the proposed district.

(c) A description of the boundaries of the district, including the boundaries of benefit zones, proposed for establishment or extension in a manner sufficient to identify the affected property and businesses included, which may be made by reference to any plan or map that is on file with the clerk. The boundaries of a proposed property assessment district shall not overlap with the boundaries of another existing property assessment district created pursuant to this part. This part does not prohibit the boundaries of a district created pursuant to this part to overlap with other assessment districts established pursuant to other provisions of law, including, but not limited to, the
 Parking and Business Improvement Area Law of 1989 (Part 6 (commencing with Section 36500)). This part does not prohibit the boundaries of a business assessment district created pursuant to this part to overlap with another business assessment district created pursuant to this part. This part does not prohibit the boundaries of a business assessment district created pursuant to this part to overlap with a property assessment district created pursuant to this part.

(d) The improvements, maintenance, and activities proposed for each year of operation of the district and the estimated cost thereof. If the improvements, maintenance, and activities proposed for each year of operation are the same, a description of the first year’s proposed improvements, maintenance, and activities and a statement that the same improvements, maintenance, and
 activities are proposed for subsequent years shall satisfy the requirements of this subdivision.

(e) The total annual amount proposed to be expended for improvements, maintenance, or activities, and debt service in each year of operation of the district. If the assessment is levied on businesses, this amount may be estimated based upon the assessment rate. If the total annual amount proposed to be expended in each year of operation of the district is not significantly different, the amount proposed to be expended in the initial year and a statement that a similar amount applies to subsequent years shall satisfy the requirements of this subdivision.

(f) The proposed source or sources of financing, including the proposed method and basis of levying the assessment in sufficient detail
 to allow each property or business owner to calculate the amount of the assessment to be levied against their property or business. The plan also shall state whether bonds will be issued to finance improvements.

(g) The time and manner of collecting the assessments.

(h) The specific number of years in which assessments will be levied. In a new district, the maximum number of years shall be five. Upon renewal, a district shall have a term not to exceed 10 years. Notwithstanding these limitations, a district created pursuant to this part to finance capital improvements with bonds may levy assessments until the maximum maturity of the bonds. The management district plan may set forth specific increases in assessments for each year of operation of the district.

(i) The proposed time for implementation and completion of the management district plan.

(j) Any proposed rules and regulations to be applicable to the district.

(k) (1) A list of the properties or businesses to be assessed, including the assessor’s parcel numbers for properties to be assessed, and a statement of the method or methods by which the expenses of a district will be imposed upon benefited real property or businesses, in proportion to the benefit received by the property or business, to defray the cost thereof.

(2) In a property-based district, the proportionate special benefit derived by each identified parcel shall be
 determined exclusively in relationship to the entirety of the capital cost of a public improvement, the maintenance and operation expenses of a public improvement, or the cost of the activities. An assessment shall not be imposed on any parcel that exceeds the reasonable cost of the proportional special benefit conferred on that parcel. Only special benefits are assessable, and a property-based district shall separate the general benefits, if any, from the special benefits conferred on a parcel. Parcels within a property-based district that are owned or used by any city, public agency, the State of California, or the United States shall not be exempt from assessment unless the governmental entity can demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that those publicly owned parcels in fact receive no special benefit. The value of any incidental, secondary, or collateral effects that arise from the
 improvements, maintenance, or activities of a property-based district and that benefit property or persons not assessed shall not be deducted from the entirety of the cost of any special benefit or affect the proportionate special benefit derived by each identified parcel.

(3) In a property-based district, properties throughout the district may share the same special benefits. In a district with boundaries that define which parcels are to receive improvements, maintenance, or activities over and above those services provided by the city, the improvements, maintenance, or activities themselves may constitute a special benefit. The city may impose assessments that are less than the proportional special benefit conferred, but shall not impose assessments that exceed the reasonable costs of the proportional special benefit
 conferred. Because one or more parcels pay less than the special benefit conferred does not necessarily mean that other parcels are assessed more than the reasonable cost of their special benefit.

(l) In a property-based district, a detailed engineer’s report prepared by a registered professional engineer certified by the State of California supporting all assessments contemplated by the management district plan.

(m) Any other item or matter required to be incorporated therein by the city
 council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 129, Sec. 2.   (AB 2890)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

36623.

(a) If a city council proposes to levy a new or increased property assessment, the notice and protest and hearing procedure shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(b) If a city council proposes to levy a new or increased business assessment, the notice and protest and hearing procedure shall comply with Section 54954.6 of the Government Code, except that notice shall be mailed to the owners of the businesses proposed to be assessed. A protest may be made orally or in writing by any interested person. Every written protest shall be filed with the clerk at or before the time fixed for the public hearing. The city council may waive any irregularity in the form or content of any written protest. A written
 protest may be withdrawn in writing at any time before the conclusion of the public hearing. Each written protest shall contain a description of the business in which the person subscribing the protest is interested sufficient to identify the business and, if a person subscribing is not shown on the official records of the city as the owner of the business, the protest shall contain or be accompanied by written evidence that the person subscribing is the owner of the business or the authorized representative. A written protest that does not comply with this section shall not be counted in determining a majority protest. If written protests are received from the owners or authorized representatives of businesses in the proposed district that will pay 50 percent or more of the assessments proposed to be levied and protests are not withdrawn so as to reduce the protests to less than 50 percent, no further proceedings to levy the proposed assessment against such businesses, as contained in the resolution of
 intention, shall be taken for a period of one year from the date of the finding of a majority protest by the city council.

(c) If a city council proposes to conduct a single proceeding to levy both a new or increased property assessment and a new or increased business assessment, the notice and protest and hearing procedure for the property assessment shall comply with subdivision (a), and the notice and protest and hearing procedure for the business assessment shall comply with subdivision (b). If a majority protest is received from either the property or business owners, that respective portion of the assessment shall not be levied. The remaining portion of the assessment may be levied unless the improvement or other special benefit was proposed to be funded by assessing both property and business owners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 330, Sec. 21.   (SB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

36624.

At the conclusion of the public hearing to establish the district, the city council may adopt, revise, change, reduce, or modify the proposed assessment or the type or types of improvements, maintenance, and activities to be funded with the revenues from the assessments. Proposed assessments may only be revised by reducing any or all of them. At the public hearing, the city council may only make changes in, to, or from the boundaries of the proposed property and business improvement district that will exclude territory that will not benefit from the proposed improvements, maintenance, and activities. Any modifications, revisions, reductions, or changes to the proposed assessment district shall be reflected in the notice and map
 recorded pursuant to Section 36627.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 240, Sec. 17.   (AB 2618)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

36625.

(a) If the city council, following the public hearing, decides to establish a proposed property and business improvement district, the city council shall adopt a resolution of formation that shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:
